Arkansas, session 2025, HB1443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 32, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 6 — Second Amendment Financial Privacy Act

23-32-601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Second
Amendment Financial Privacy Act".

23-32-602. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
*ANS220*
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
(1) "Ammunition" means ammunition or cartridge cases, primers,
bullets, or propellant powder designed for use in a firearm;
(2) "Antique firearm" means the same as defined in 18 U.S.C.
921, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(3) "Assign" or "assignment" means a financial institution's
policy, process, or practice that labels, links, or otherwise associates a
firearms code with a merchant or payment card transaction in a manner that
allows the financial institution, payment network, or any other entity
facilitating or processing the payment card transaction to identify whether a
merchant is a firearms retailer or whether a transaction involves the sale of
firearms, firearm accessories or components, or ammunition;
(4)(A) "Customer" means a person physically located in this
state who is engaged in a payment card transaction that a financial
institution facilitates or processes.
(B) "Customer" includes a person or the person's
authorized representative who has transacted business with or has used the
services of a financial institution or for whom a financial institution has
acted as a fiduciary in relation to an account maintained in the person's
name;
(5) "Depository institution" means:
(A) A depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. §
1813(c)(1), as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(B) An insured credit union as defined in 12 U.S.C. §
1752(7), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(6) "Disclosure" means the transfer, publication, or
distribution of protected financial information to another person or entity
for any purpose other than to process or facilitate a payment card
transaction;
(7)(A) "Financial institution" means an entity involved in
facilitating or processing a payment card transaction.
(B) "Financial institution" includes:
(i) An acquirer;
(ii) A payment card issuer;
(iii) A depository institution;
(iv) A trust company;
(v) A savings bank;
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
(vi) A person subject to the jurisdiction of the:
(a) United States Securities and Exchange
Commission;
(b) Bank Commissioner under the Arkansas
Banking Code of 1997, chapters 45-50 of this title;
(c) Securities Commissioner under the Arkansas
Securities Act, § 23-42-101 et seq.;
(d) Insurance Commissioner under the Arkansas
Insurance Code; or
(e) Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; and
(vii) Any other institution that:
(a) Holds and receives deposits, savings, or
share accounts;
(b) Issues certificates of deposit;
(c) Provides to its customers any deposit
accounts subject to withdrawal by check, instrument, order, or electronic
means to effect third-party payments;
(d) Provides insurance services; or
(e) Provides investment services;
(8) "Financial record" means:
(A) The original or a copy of a record or document held by
a payment network pertaining to a customer of a financial institution
utilizing a payment network, including a record of a transaction conducted by
means of a customer bank communication terminal or other electronic device;
(B) A financial record held by a payment network related
to a payment card transaction that the financial institution has processed or
facilitated; and
(C) Any information derived from the records or documents
described in subdivisions (8)(A) and (B) of this section;
(9) "Firearm" means a weapon that will, is designed to, or may
readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;
(10) "Firearm accessory or component" means:
(A) An attachment or device specifically adapted to:
(i) Enable the:
(a) Wearing or carrying of a firearm about
one's person; or
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
(b) Storage of a firearm in, or the mounting
of a firearm in or upon, a conveyance; or
(ii) Be inserted into or affixed onto a firearm to
enable, alter, or improve the functioning or capabilities of a firearm;
(B) An item that is used in conjunction with or mounted
upon a firearm, including without limitation:
(i) A telescopic or laser sight;
(ii) A magazine;
(iii) A flash or sound suppressor;
(iv) A folding or aftermarket stock and grip;
(v) A speedloader;
(vi) A brace;
(vii) An ammunition carrier; and
(viii) A light for target illumination; and
(C) A component for making ammunition, reloading materials
and equipment, machinery, and tools for manufacturing ammunition;
(11)(A) "Firearms code" means a code or other indicator that a
payment network or financial institution assigns to a merchant or to a
payment card transaction that identifies whether or not:
(i) A merchant is a firearms retailer; or
(ii) The payment card transaction involves the
purchase of a firearm, a firearm accessory or component, or ammunition.
(B) "Firearms code" includes without limitation a merchant
category code assigned to a firearms retailer by a payment network or other
financial institution;
(12) "Firearms retailer" means a person or entity physically
located in this state and engaged in the lawful business of selling or
trading firearms, antique firearms, firearm accessories or components, or
ammunition;
(13)(A) "Government entity" means a state, local government, or
instrumentality of a state or local government.
(B) "Government entity" includes an official, agent, or
employee of a state or local government;
(14)(A) "Merchant" means a person or entity physically located
in this state that accepts payment cards from customers for the purchase of
goods or services.
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
(B) "Merchant" includes a firearms retailer that accepts
payment cards for the lawful purchase of firearms, firearm accessories or
components, or ammunition;
(15) "Payment card" means a credit card, charge card, debit
card, or any other card that is issued to an authorized card user and that
allows the user to purchase goods or services from a merchant;
(16) "Payment network" means a debit or credit network through
which funds may be transferred, including credit card associations,
electronic funds transfer networks, or other organizations or associations,
that issue or sponsor a financial transaction device;
(17)(A) "Protected financial information" means the record of a
sale, purchase, return, or refund involving a payment card that is retrieved,
characterized, generated, labeled, sorted, or grouped based on the assignment
of a firearms code.
(B) "Protected financial information" includes the
financial records of a customer;
(18) "Savings bank" means a savings association or federal
savings association as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1462, as it existed on January
1, 2025; and
(19) "Trust company" means:
(A) A national bank engaged in activities in a fiduciary
capacity under 12 U.S.C. § 92a and 12 C.F.R. Part 9;
(B) A trust company as defined in § 23-51-102; or
(C) An interstate bank that is authorized under the
Arkansas Banking Code of 1997, chapters 45-50 of this title, to exercise the
powers of a trust company in this state.

23-32-603. Financial privacy — Firearm-owner rights.
(a)(1) A government entity, a payment network or an entity or agent
acting on behalf of a payment network, or a financial institution or an
entity or agent acting on behalf of a financial institution shall not
knowingly keep or cause to be kept a list, record, or registry of:
(A) Privately owned firearms; or
(B) Owners of privately owned firearms.
(2) Subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply to:
(A) Records kept during the regular course of a criminal
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
investigation or prosecution;
(B) Records kept in the regular course of business by a
firearms retailer;
(C) Information submitted to a law enforcement agency in
connection with an application for a license to carry a concealed handgun and
maintained under § 5-73-307 subject to the restrictions under § 5-73-307 and
under § 25-19-105(b); or
(D) Records kept as otherwise required by law.
(b) A financial institution, a payment network, or agents of a payment
network shall not require or incentivize the usage of a firearms code in a
way that distinguishes a firearms retailer from general merchandise retailers
or sporting goods retailers located in this state.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, a
financial institution or payment network shall not discriminate against a
firearms retailer by:
(1) Declining a lawful payment card transaction based solely on
the assignment or nonassignment of a firearms code to the firearms retailer
or transaction;
(2) Limiting or declining to do business with a customer,
potential customer, or merchant based on the assignment or nonassignment of a
firearms code to any previous lawful transaction involving the customer,
potential customer, or merchant;
(3) Charging a higher transaction or interchange fee to a
merchant or for a lawful transaction based on the assignment or nonassignment
of a firearms code; or
(4) Otherwise taking any action against a customer or merchant
that is intended to suppress lawful commerce involving firearms, firearm
accessories or components, or ammunition when that action is based solely or
in part on the customer's or merchant's business involving firearms, firearm
accessories or components, or ammunition.
(d) A financial institution or payment network shall not disclose a
financial record or protected financial information, including a firearms
code, that was collected in violation of this subchapter unless the
disclosure of the financial record or protected financial information is
based on a good faith conclusion that the financial institution's action was
required by applicable law.
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
(e) A payment network or financial institution may decline or
otherwise refuse to process a lawful payment card transaction involving a
firearms retailer on the basis of the assignment or nonassignment of a
firearms code:
(1) If necessary to comply with applicable state or federal law;
(2) At the request of the customer;
(3) According to fraud controls or merchant category exclusions
offered by a financial institution for the purpose of expenditure control or
corporate card control applicable to the payment card involved in the payment
card transaction; or
(4) For purposes of restricting the use or availability of a
firearms code in Arkansas.
(f) With respect to a payment card transaction, this subchapter does
not limit the ability of a payment network to negotiate with a responsible
party or otherwise impair the payment network's actions related to:
(1) Dispute processing;
(2) Fraud risk or credit management in the ordinary course of
business operations; or
(3) Protecting the integrity of the payment card transaction
with respect to illegal activity, security breaches, or risk of cyberattacks.

23-32-604. Enforcement.
(a)(1)(A) The Attorney General may investigate alleged violations of
this subchapter and, upon finding a violation, shall provide written notice
to an individual or entity that is violating this subchapter.
(B) The written notice required under subdivision
(a)(1)(A) of this section shall be made to the entity's registered agent or
the individual.
(2) Upon receipt of the written notice under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section, the individual or entity shall cease the violation of this
subchapter within thirty (30) days after receiving notice from the Attorney
General under this section.
(3) The Attorney General may grant an entity up to an additional
thirty (30) days to cease the violation of this subchapter.
(b)(1) A firearms retailer whose business was the subject of an
alleged violation of this subchapter or a customer who completed a
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
transaction with a firearms retailer whose business was the subject of an
alleged violation of this subchapter may petition the Attorney General to
investigate an alleged violation of this subchapter.
(2) If the Attorney General does not commence an action within
ninety (90) days of receiving the petition under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section, the firearms retailer or customer may file an action in a court of
competent jurisdiction to enjoin the individual or entity from violations of
this subchapter.
(c)(1) If an individual or entity fails to cease the violation under
subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the Attorney General shall request an
injunction against the individual or entity alleged to be in violation of
this subchapter, which a court may order, in addition to any other available
relief, as the court may consider appropriate.
(2) If a court finds that the individual or entity continues to
be in violation of this subchapter after thirty (30) calendar days from
receiving written notice under subdivision (a)(1)(A) or subdivision (a)(3) of
this section, then the court shall enjoin the individual or entity from
continuing the activity found to be in violation of this subchapter.
(3)(A)(i) If the individual or entity knowingly fails to comply
with an injunction under subdivision (c)(2) of this section within thirty
(30) calendar days after being served with an injunction, then the Attorney
General shall petition the court to recover a civil penalty in a sum not to
exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each violation committed after
the expiration of the thirty-day period under this subdivision (c)(3)(A).
(ii) Each transaction in violation of this
subchapter constitutes a separate violation.
(B) In assessing a penalty, the court may consider the
financial resources of the individual or entity that violated this subchapter
and the harm or risk of harm to the rights afforded to the firearms retailer
or customer under Arkansas Constitution, Article 2, § 5 and the Second
Amendment to the United States Constitution resulting from the violation.
(C) In addition to the remedies provided under this
section, the Attorney General or a petitioner who prevails in an action under
this section shall recover costs, including investiative costs and expert
fees, reasonable attorney's fees, and any other remedy the court deems
appropriate.
03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 HB1443
(D) An order assessing a penalty for a violation of this
subchapter shall be stayed pending appeal of the order and upon filing a
supersedeas bond with the court.
(d) It is not a defense to an action filed under this section that the
information was disclosed to a United States Government entity unless the
disclosure or action was made based on a good faith conclusion that the
disclosure or action was required by federal law or regulation.

23-32-605. Applicability.
This subchapter does not apply to a payment card transaction that is
initiated at a firearms retailer's physical location outside of Arkansas,
whether or not:
(1) The purchaser in the payment card transaction is a consumer
who resides in Arkansas; or
(2) The firearms retailer has at least one (1) physical location
in Arkansas.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This act is effective on and after September 1, 2025.

/s/Pilkington















03-12-2025 11:23:15 ANS220